Hawaii, session 2025, HB235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that traffic safety is a significant and growing concern across the State--in urban, suburban, and rural areas.  The legislature further finds that the use of photo red light imaging detector systems has demonstrated success in reducing collisions and that the use of automated speed enforcement systems will have similarly beneficial effects for traffic safety. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to require the department of transportation to expand the use of photo red light imaging detector systems and automated speed enforcement systems to locations on the north shore of Oahu. SECTION 2.  (a)  The department of transportation shall expand the use of photo red light imaging detector systems, pursuant to chapter 291J, Hawaii Revised Statues, and automated speed enforcement systems, pursuant to chapter 291L, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to locations on the north shore of Oahu. (b)  The department of transportation shall select locations on the north shore of Oahu at which to implement subsection (a).  In selecting these locations, the department of transportation shall seek public input from the community. (c)  No later than twenty days before the convening of the regular session of 2026, the department of transportation shall submit to the legislature a report concerning its progress in implementing subsection (a). SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________